California statutes. Corporations Code
(2) Under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) against any or all directors liable, by any one or more creditors of the social purpose corporation whose debts or claims arose prior to the time of any of the corporate actions specified in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) and who have not consented to the corporate action, regardless of whether they have reduced their claims to judgment.

(3) Under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) against any or all directors liable, by any one or more holders of shares outstanding at the time of any corporate action specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) who have not consented to the corporate action, without regard to the provisions of Section 2900.

(d) The damages recoverable from a director
 under this section shall be the amount of the illegal distribution, or if the illegal distribution consists of property, the fair market value of that property at the time of the illegal distribution, plus interest thereon from the date of the distribution at the legal rate on judgments until paid, together with all reasonably incurred costs of appraisal or other valuation, if any, of that property or loss suffered by the social purpose corporation as a result of the illegal loan or guaranty, respectively, but not exceeding the liabilities of the social purpose corporation owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation and the injury suffered by nonconsenting shareholders.

(e) Any director sued under this section may implead all other directors liable and may compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against directors not joined in that action.

(f) Directors liable under this section shall also be entitled to be subrogated to the rights of the social purpose corporation:

(1) With respect to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), against shareholders who received the distribution.

(2) With respect to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), against shareholders who received the distribution of assets.

(3) With respect to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), against the person who received the loan or guaranty.

Any director sued under this section may file a cross-complaint against the person or persons who are liable to the director as a result of the subrogation provided for in this subdivision or may proceed against them in an independent action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 43.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Agent” means any person who is or was a director, officer, employee, or other agent of the social purpose corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the social purpose corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of a foreign or domestic corporation which was a predecessor corporation of the social purpose corporation or of another enterprise at the request of the predecessor corporation.

(2) “Proceeding” means any threatened, pending, or completed action
 or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative.

(3) “Expenses” includes without limitation attorneys’ fees and any expenses of establishing a right to indemnification under subdivision (b).

(b) Subject to the standards and restrictions, if any, set forth in its articles or bylaws, and subject to the limitations required by paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 2603, a social purpose corporation may indemnify and hold harmless any agent or any other person from and against any and all claims and demands whatsoever.

(c) Expenses incurred in defending any proceeding may be advanced by the social purpose corporation prior to the final disposition of the proceeding. The provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 315 do not apply to advances made pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) A social purpose corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any of its agents against any liability asserted against or incurred by the agent in that capacity or arising out of the agent’s status as an agent regardless of whether the social purpose corporation would have the power to indemnify the agent against that liability under this section. The fact that a social purpose corporation owns all or a portion of the shares of the company issuing a policy of insurance shall not render this subdivision inapplicable if either of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The insurance provided by this subdivision is limited as indemnification is required to be limited by paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 2603.

(2) (A) The company issuing the insurance policy is
 organized, licensed, and operated in a manner that complies with the insurance laws and regulations applicable to its jurisdiction of organization.

(B) The company issuing the policy provides procedures for processing claims that do not permit that company to be subject to the direct control of the social purpose corporation that purchased that policy.

(C) The policy issued provides for some manner of risk sharing between the issuer and purchaser of the policy, on one hand, and some unaffiliated person or persons, on the other, such as by providing for more than one unaffiliated owner of the company issuing the policy or by providing that a portion of the coverage furnished will be obtained from some unaffiliated insurer or reinsurer.

(e) This section does not apply to any proceeding against any trustee, investment
 manager, or other fiduciary of an employee benefit plan in that person’s capacity as such, even though the person may also be an agent as defined in subdivision (a) of the employer social purpose corporation. A social purpose corporation shall have power to indemnify a trustee, investment manager, or other fiduciary to the extent permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 2605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 44.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Shares and Share Certificates [2800. - 2800.]

2800.

(a) All certificates representing shares of a social purpose corporation shall contain, in addition to any other statements required by this section, the following conspicuous language on the face of the certificate.

“This entity is a social purpose corporation organized under Division 1.5 of the California Corporations Code. The articles of this corporation state one or more purposes required by law. Refer to the articles on file with the Secretary of State, and the bylaws and any agreements on file with the secretary of the corporation, for further information.”

(b) There shall also appear on the certificate, the initial transaction statement, and written statements, unless stated or summarized under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 417, the statements required by all of the following, to the extent applicable:

(1) The fact that the shares are subject to restrictions upon transfer.

(2) If the shares are assessable or are not fully paid, a statement that they are assessable or the statements required by subdivision (d) of Section 409 if they are not fully paid.

(3) The fact that the shares are subject to a voting agreement under subdivision (a) of Section 706 or an irrevocable proxy under subdivision (e) of Section 705 or restrictions upon voting rights contractually imposed by the social purpose corporation.

(4) The fact that the shares are redeemable.

(5) The fact that the shares are convertible and the period for conversion.

Statements or references to statements on the face of the certificate, the initial transaction statement, and written statements required by paragraph (1) or (2) shall be conspicuous.

(c) Unless stated on the certificate, the initial transaction statement, and written statements as required by subdivision (a), no restriction upon transfer, no right of redemption and no voting agreement under subdivision (a) of Section 706, no irrevocable proxy under subdivision (e) of Section 705, and no voting restriction imposed by the social purpose corporation shall be enforceable against a transferee of the shares without actual knowledge of the restriction, right, agreement, or proxy. With regard only to liability to
 assessment or for the unpaid portion of the subscription price, unless stated on the certificate as required by subdivision (a), that liability shall not be enforceable against a transferee of the shares. For the purpose of this subdivision, “transferee” includes a purchaser from the social purpose corporation.

(d) All certificates representing shares of a close social purpose corporation shall contain, in addition to any other statements required by this section, the following conspicuous legend on the face thereof:

“This social purpose corporation is a close social purpose corporation. The number of holders of record of its shares of all classes cannot exceed ____ (a number not in excess of 35). Any attempted voluntary inter vivos transfer which would violate this requirement is void. Refer to the articles, bylaws, and any agreements
 on file with the secretary of the social purpose corporation for further restrictions.”

(e) Any attempted voluntary inter vivos transfer of the shares of a close social purpose corporation that would result in the number of holders of record of its shares exceeding the maximum number specified in its articles is void if the certificate contains the legend required by subdivision (c).

(f) Notwithstanding any other subdivision, the certificates representing shares of a corporation formed pursuant to this division as a “flexible purpose corporation” before January 1, 2015, shall continue to be valid even if the certificates reference a “flexible purpose corporation.” A corporation formed pursuant to this division before January 1, 2015, may, but is not required to, reissue certificates to replace “flexible purpose
 corporation” with “social purpose corporation” as applicable. Any reference to a “flexible purpose corporation” or any abbreviation of that term in certificates representing shares of a corporation formed pursuant to this division before January 1, 2015, shall also be a reference to “social purpose corporation.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 45.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Shareholder Derivative Actions [2900. - 2900.]

2900.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Social purpose corporation” includes an unincorporated association.

(2) “Board” includes the managing body of an unincorporated association.

(3) “Shareholder” includes a member of an unincorporated association.

(4) “Shares” includes memberships in an unincorporated association.

(b) Shareholders of a social purpose corporation may maintain a derivative lawsuit to enforce the requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2700.

(c) No action may be instituted or maintained in right of any domestic or foreign social purpose corporation under this section by any party other than a shareholder of the social purpose corporation.

(d) No action may be instituted or maintained in right of any domestic or foreign social purpose corporation by any holder of shares or of voting trust certificates of the social purpose corporation unless both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The plaintiff alleges in the complaint that plaintiff was a shareholder, of record or beneficially, or the holder of voting trust certificates at the time of the transaction or any part thereof of which plaintiff complains or that plaintiff’s shares or voting trust certificates thereafter devolved upon plaintiff by operation of law from a holder who was a holder at the time of
 the transaction or any part thereof complained of. Any shareholder who does not meet these requirements may nevertheless be allowed, in the discretion of the court, to maintain the action on a preliminary showing to and determination by the court, by motion and after a hearing, at which the court shall consider the evidence by affidavit or testimony, as it deems material, of all of the following:

(A) There is a strong prima facie case in favor of the claim asserted on behalf of the social purpose corporation.

(B) No other similar action has been or is likely to be instituted.

(C) The plaintiff acquired the shares before there was disclosure to the public or to the plaintiff of the wrongdoing of which plaintiff complains.

(D) Unless the action can be
 maintained the defendant may retain a gain derived from defendant’s willful breach of a fiduciary duty.

(E) The requested relief will not result in unjust enrichment of the social purpose corporation or any shareholder of the social purpose corporation.

(2) The plaintiff alleges in the complaint with particularity plaintiff’s efforts to secure from the board the action as plaintiff desires, or the reasons for not making that effort, and alleges further that plaintiff has either informed the social purpose corporation or the board in writing of the ultimate facts of each cause of action against each defendant or delivered to the social purpose corporation or the board a true copy of the complaint which plaintiff proposes to file.

(e) In any action referred to in subdivision (c), at any time within 30 days after
 service of summons upon the social purpose corporation or upon any defendant who is an officer or director of the social purpose corporation, or held that office at the time of the acts complained of, the social purpose corporation or the defendant may move the court for an order, upon notice and hearing, requiring the plaintiff to furnish a bond as hereinafter provided. The motion shall be based upon one or both of the following grounds:

(1) There is no reasonable possibility that the prosecution of the cause of action alleged in the complaint against the moving party will benefit the social purpose corporation or its shareholders.

(2) The moving party, if other than the social purpose corporation, did not participate in the transaction complained of in any capacity.

The court on application of the social purpose corporation or any
 defendant may, for good cause shown, extend the 30-day period for an additional period or periods not exceeding 60 days.

(f) At the hearing upon any motion pursuant to subdivision (d), the court shall consider the evidence, written or oral, by witnesses or affidavit, as may be material to the ground or grounds upon which the motion is based, or to a determination of the probable reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, of the social purpose corporation and the moving party that will be incurred in the defense of the action. If the court determines, after hearing the evidence adduced by the parties, that the moving party has established a probability in support of any of the grounds upon which the motion is based, the court shall fix the amount of the bond, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), to be furnished by the plaintiff for reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, which may be incurred by the moving party and the
 social purpose corporation in connection with the action, including expenses for which the social purpose corporation may become liable pursuant to Section 2702. A ruling by the court on the motion shall not be a determination of any issue in the action or of the merits thereof. If the court, upon the motion, makes a determination that a bond shall be furnished by the plaintiff as to any one or more defendants, the action shall be dismissed as to the defendant or defendants, unless the bond required by the court has been furnished within such reasonable time as may be fixed by the court.

(g) If the plaintiff, either before or after a motion is made pursuant to subdivision (d), or any order or determination pursuant to the motion, furnishes a bond in the aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to secure the reasonable expenses of the parties entitled to make the motion, the plaintiff shall be deemed to have complied with the
 requirements of this section and with any order for a bond theretofore made, and any motion then pending shall be dismissed and no further or additional bond shall be required.

(h) If a motion is filed pursuant to subdivision (d), no pleadings need be filed by the social purpose corporation or any other defendant and the prosecution of the action shall be stayed until 10 days after the motion has been disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 46.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Amendment of Articles [3000. - 3002.]

3000.

(a) A proposed amendment to the articles of a social purpose corporation shall be approved by the outstanding shares of a class, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, if the amendment would:

(1) Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of that class, other than an increase as provided in either subdivision (b) of Section 405 or subdivision (b) of Section 902.

(2) Effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of all or part of the shares of that class, including a reverse stock split but excluding a stock split.

(3) Effect an exchange, or create a right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into the shares of that class.

(4) Change the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of the shares of that class.

(5) Create a new class of shares having rights, preferences, or privileges prior to the shares of that class, or increase the rights, preferences, or privileges or the number of authorized shares of any class having rights, preferences, or privileges prior to the shares of that class.

(6) In the case of preferred shares, divide the shares of any class into series having different rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions or authorize the board to do so.

(7) Cancel or otherwise affect dividends on the shares of
 that class that have accrued but have not been paid.

(b) A proposed amendment shall be approved by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, if the amendment would materially alter any special purpose of the social purpose corporation stated in the articles pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2602, regardless of whether that purpose, as amended, would comply with the provisions of that paragraph.

(c) Different series of the same class shall not constitute different classes for the purpose of voting by classes except when a series is adversely affected by an amendment in a different manner than other shares of the same class.

(d) In addition to approval by a class as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), a proposed amendment shall also be approved by the outstanding voting shares (Section 152).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 47.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

(a) A social purpose corporation may, by amendment of its articles pursuant to this section, change its status to that of a nonprofit public benefit corporation, nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, nonprofit religious corporation, or cooperative corporation.

(b) The amendment of the articles to change its status to a nonprofit corporation shall revise the statement of purpose, delete the authorization for shares and any other provisions relating to authorized or issued shares, make other changes as may be necessary or desired, and, if any shares have been issued, provide either for the cancellation of those shares or for the conversion of those shares to memberships of the nonprofit corporation. The amendment of the
 articles to change status to a cooperative corporation shall revise the statement of purpose, make other changes as may be necessary or desired, and, if any shares have been issued, provide for the cancellation of those shares or for the change of those shares to memberships of the cooperative corporation, if necessary.

(c) If shares have been issued, an amendment to change status to a nonprofit corporation shall be approved by all of the outstanding shares of all classes regardless of limitations or restrictions on their voting rights and an amendment to change status to a cooperative corporation shall be approved by the outstanding shares of each class regardless of limitations or restrictions on their voting rights.

(d) If an amendment pursuant to this section is included in a merger agreement, the provisions of this section shall apply, except that any provision for
 cancellation or conversion of shares shall be in the merger agreement rather than in the amendment of the articles.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if a social purpose corporation is a mutual water company within the meaning of Section 2705 of the Public Utilities Code and under the terms of the status change each outstanding share is converted to a membership of a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, an amendment to change status to a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation shall be approved by the outstanding shares of each class regardless of limitations or restrictions on their voting rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 48.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

(a) A social purpose corporation may, by amendment of its articles pursuant to this section, change its status to that of a business corporation.

(b) The amendment of the articles to change status to a business corporation shall revise the statement of purpose to delete any provisions in the articles that are permitted by Section 2602, but that are not permitted to be in the articles of a domestic corporation.

(c) If shares have been issued, an amendment to change status to a business corporation shall be approved by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, regardless of
 whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles. If the status change is approved, shareholders with dissenting shares, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300, may exercise dissenters’ rights pursuant to Section 3305 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1.

(d) If an amendment pursuant to this section is included in a merger agreement, the provisions of this section shall apply, except that any provision for cancellation or conversion of shares shall be in the merger agreement rather than in the amendment of the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 49.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Sales of Assets [3100. - 3100.]

3100.

(a) A social purpose corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets when the principal terms of the transaction are approved by the board and are approved by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, either before or after approval by the board and before the transaction. A transaction constituting a reorganization shall be subject to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 1 and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400) of this division and shall not be subject to this section, other than subdivision (d). A transaction constituting a conversion shall be subject
 to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 1150) of Division 1 and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 3300) of this division and shall not be subject to this section.

(b) Notwithstanding approval of two-thirds of the outstanding shares, the board may abandon the proposed transaction without further action by the shareholders, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(c) The sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer, or other disposition may be made upon those terms and conditions and for that consideration as the board may deem in the best interests of the social purpose corporation. The consideration may be money, securities, or other property.

(d) If the acquiring party in a transaction pursuant to subdivision (a) or subdivision (g) of Section 2001 is in control of or under common control with
 the disposing social purpose corporation, the principal terms of the sale shall be approved by at least 90 percent of the voting power of the disposing social purpose corporation unless the disposition is to a domestic or foreign other business entity or social purpose corporation, the articles of incorporation of which specify materially the same purposes, in consideration of the nonredeemable common shares or nonredeemable equity securities of the acquiring party or its parent.

(e) Subdivision (d) shall not apply to a transaction if the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Insurance Commissioner, or the Public Utilities Commission has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of those terms and conditions pursuant to Section 25142, Section 1209 of the Financial Code, Section 838.5 of the Insurance Code, or Section 822 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 52.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Merger [3200. - 3203.]

3200.

If any disappearing social purpose corporation in a merger is a close social purpose corporation and the surviving social purpose corporation is not a close social purpose corporation, the merger shall be approved by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, of the disappearing social purpose corporation. The articles may provide for a lesser vote, but not less than a majority of the outstanding shares of each class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 51.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

If any disappearing corporation in a merger is a social purpose corporation and the surviving entity is not a social purpose corporation, or is a social purpose corporation the articles of incorporation of which set forth materially different purposes, the merger shall be approved by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, regardless of whether that class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, of the disappearing social purpose corporation. If the merger is approved, shareholders with dissenting shares, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300, may exercise dissenters’ rights pursuant to Section 3305 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division
 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 52.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

If a disappearing social purpose corporation in a merger is a social purpose corporation governed by this division and the surviving corporation is a nonprofit public benefit corporation, a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, or a nonprofit religious corporation, the merger shall be approved by all of the outstanding shares of all classes of the disappearing social purpose corporation, regardless of limitations or restrictions on their voting rights, notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 53.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

(a) Any one or more social purpose corporations may merge with one or more other business entities. One or more domestic social purpose corporations not organized under this division and one or more foreign corporations may be parties to the merger. Notwithstanding this section, the merger of any number of social purpose corporations with any number of other business entities may be effected only if:

(1) In a merger in which a domestic social purpose corporation not organized under this division or a domestic other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(2) In a merger in which a foreign
 corporation is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(3) In a merger in which a foreign other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(b) Each social purpose corporation and each other party that desires to merge shall approve, and shall be a party to, an agreement of merger. Other persons, including a parent party, may be parties to the agreement of merger. The board of each social purpose corporation that desires to merge, and, if required, the shareholders, shall approve the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each party by those persons required to approve the merger by the laws under which it is organized. The agreement of merger shall state:

(1) The terms
 and conditions of the merger.

(2) The name and place of incorporation or organization of each party to the merger and the identity of the surviving party.

(3) The amendments, if any, subject to Sections 900, 902, 907, and 3002 to the articles of the surviving social purpose corporation, if applicable, to be effected by the merger. If any amendment changes the name of the surviving social purpose corporation, if applicable, the new name may be, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 2601, the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing party to the merger.

(4) The manner of converting the shares of each constituent social purpose corporation into shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving party. If any shares of any constituent social purpose corporation are not to be converted solely into shares,
 interests, or other securities of the surviving party, the agreement of merger shall state (A) the cash, rights, securities, or other property that the holders of those shares are to receive in exchange for the shares, which cash, rights, securities, or other property may be in addition to or in lieu of shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving party, or (B) that the shares are canceled without consideration.

(5) Any other details or provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized, including, if a domestic corporation is a party to the merger, Section 3203, if a public benefit corporation or a religious corporation is a party to the merger, Section 6019.1, if a mutual benefit corporation is a party to the merger, Section 8019.1, if a consumer cooperative corporation is a party to the merger, Section 12540.1, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, Section 15911.12, if a domestic
 partnership is a party to the merger, Section 16911, and if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, Section 17551.

(6) Any other details or provisions as are desired, including, without limitation, a provision for the payment of cash in lieu of fractional shares or for any other arrangement with respect thereto consistent with the provisions of Section 407.

(c) Each share of the same class or series of any constituent social purpose corporation, other than the cancellation of shares held by a party to the merger or its parent, or a wholly owned subsidiary of either, in another constituent social purpose corporation, shall, unless all shareholders of the class or series consent and except as provided in Section 407, be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, rights, securities, or other property. Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (b), the nonredeemable common shares of a constituent social purpose corporation may be converted only into nonredeemable common shares of a surviving social purpose corporation or a parent party or nonredeemable equity securities of a surviving party other than a social purpose corporation if another party to the merger or its parent owns, directly or indirectly, prior to the merger shares of that corporation representing more than 50 percent of the voting power of that social purpose corporation, unless all of the shareholders of the class consent and except as provided in Section 407.

(d) Notwithstanding its prior approval, an agreement of merger may be amended prior to the filing of the agreement of merger or the certificate of merger, as is applicable, if the amendment is approved by the board of each constituent social purpose corporation and, if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the agreement, by the outstanding shares,
 if required by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400), in the same manner as the original agreement of merger. If the agreement of merger as so amended and approved is also approved by each of the other parties to the agreement of merger, the agreement of merger as so amended shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(e) The board of a constituent social purpose corporation may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other parties to the agreement of merger, without further approval by the outstanding shares, at any time before the merger is effective.

(f) Each constituent social purpose corporation shall sign the agreement of merger by its chairperson of the board, president, or a vice president and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(g) (1) If the surviving party is a domestic social purpose corporation, or if a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation, a public benefit corporation, a mutual benefit corporation, a religious corporation, or a corporation organized under the Consumer Cooperative Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3) is a party to the merger, after required approvals of the merger by each constituent social purpose corporation through approval of the board and any approval of the outstanding shares required by Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3400) and by the other parties to the merger, the surviving party shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent domestic social purpose corporation and foreign social purpose corporation attached stating the total number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote on the merger, and identifying any other
 person or persons whose approval is required, that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were approved by that social purpose corporation by a vote of a number of shares of each class that equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class and, if applicable, by that other person or persons whose approval is required, or that the merger agreement was entitled to be and was approved by the board alone, as provided in Section 3401, in the case of a social purpose corporation subject to that section. If equity securities of a parent party are to be issued in the merger, the officers’ certificate of that controlled party shall state either that no vote of the shareholders of the parent party was required or that the required vote was obtained. In lieu of an officers’ certificate, a certificate of merger, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, shall be filed for each constituent other
 business entity. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all managers of the limited liability company, unless a lesser number is specified in its articles or organization or operating agreement, and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners, unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement, and by each domestic constituent general partnership by two partners, unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement, and by each foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed those
 officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact, and by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for that party the provision of law or other basis for the authority of the signing persons. The certificate of merger shall set forth, if a vote of the shareholders, members, partners, or other holders of interests of the constituent other business entity was required, a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were approved by a vote of the number of interests of each class that equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class,
 and any other information required to be set forth under the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized, including, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, if a domestic partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17552. The certificate of merger for each constituent foreign other business entity, if any, shall also set forth the statutory or other basis under which that foreign other business entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving social purpose corporation, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger shall be effective upon filing of the agreement of merger with an officer’s certificate of each constituent domestic corporation and foreign corporation and a certificate of merger for each